Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB51.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Health Insurance Core Benefits Coverage Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commissioner." The Insurance Commissioner of the Commonwealth."Department." The Insurance Department of the Commonwealth."Group health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides 123456789101112131415161718 medical or health care coverage on an annual basis to individuals who obtain health insurance coverage through a group."Health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage. The term does not include any of the following:(1) An accident only policy.(2) A credit only policy.(3) A long-term care or disability income policy.(4) A specified disease policy.(5) A Medicare supplement policy.(6) A fixed indemnity policy.(7) A dental only policy.(8) A vision only policy.(9) A workers' compensation policy.(10) An automobile medical payment policy.(11) A policy under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents.(12) Any other similar policies providing for limited benefits."Individual health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage on an annual basis to an individual other than in connection with a group."Insurer." An entity that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy, contract or plan that provides medical or health care coverage by a health care facility or licensed health care provider and that is governed 20250SB0051PN0098 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV thereof.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations).(4) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).Section 3. Core health benefits.(a) Benefits.--Except as otherwise provided in this section, an insurer offering, issuing or renewing an individual health insurance policy or group health insurance policy shall include health benefits in at least the following general categories and the items and services covered within the categories:(1) Ambulatory patient services.(2) Emergency services.(3) Hospitalization.(4) Maternity and newborn care.(5) Mental health and substance use disorder services, including behavioral health treatment.(6) Prescription drugs.(7) Rehabilitative and habilitative services and devices.(8) Laboratory services.(9) Preventive and wellness services and chronic disease management.(10) Pediatric services, including oral and vision care.(b) Comprehensiveness.--20250SB0051PN0098 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An individual health insurance policy or group health insurance policy shall cover health benefits at least as comprehensive as the health benefits required to be covered in an individual health insurance policy or a small group policy first offered or issued in this Commonwealth in 2018.(2) A large group health insurance policy also shall cover health benefits required to be covered in a large group policy first offered or issued in this Commonwealth in 2018.(c) Modifications.--The department may add a health benefit or exempt a health benefit required to be covered under this section through a regulation promulgated under section 4. In determining whether to add a health benefit or exempt a health benefit required to be covered under this section, the department shall consider all of the following:(1) The balance of the health benefits in the categories specified under subsection (a) and whether the health benefits are not unduly weighted toward any category.(2) The health care needs of the diverse segments of the population, including women, children, individuals with disabilities and other diverse groups.(3) The potential for discrimination against individuals because of their age or expected length of life, present or predicted disability, degree of medical dependency, quality of life or other health conditions.(4) The accessibility of the health benefits, including the cost of the health benefits.(5) Changes in medical evidence or scientific advancement.(d) Management techniques.--Nothing in this section shall be 20250SB0051PN0098 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construed to prevent an insurer from appropriately utilizing reasonable medical management techniques.Section 4. Regulations.(a) Authority to promulgate.--The department may promulgate regulations as may be necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this act.(b) Temporary regulations.--(1) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this act, the department may issue temporary regulations, which shall expire no later than two years following publication of the temporary regulations in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The temporary regulations shall be exempt from the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(2) The authority of the department to issue temporary regulations under this subsection shall expire two years from the effective date of this section. Regulations adopted after the two-year period shall be promulgated as provided by statute.Section 5. Enforcement.20250SB0051PN0098 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Penalties.--Upon satisfactory evidence of a violation of any section of this act by an insurer or any other person, one or more of the following penalties may be imposed at the commissioner's discretion:(1) Suspension or revocation of the license of the offending insurer or other person.(2) Refusal, for a period not to exceed one year, to issue a new license to the offending insurer or other person.(3) A fine of not more than $5,000 for each violation of this act.(4) A fine of not more than $10,000 for each willful violation of this act.(b) Limitations.--(1) Fines imposed against an individual insurer under this act may not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(2) Fines imposed against any other person under this act may not exceed $100,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(c) Additional remedies.--The enforcement remedies imposed under this section are in addition to any other remedies or penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable law of this Commonwealth, including:(1) The act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act. Violations of this act shall be deemed to be an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(2) The act of December 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, No.159), known as the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act.20250SB0051PN0098 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The act of June 25, 1997 (P.L.295, No.29), known as the Pennsylvania Health Care Insurance Portability Act.(d) Administrative procedure.--The administrative provisions of this section shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies). A party against whom penalties are assessed in an administrative action may appeal to Commonwealth Court as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 6. Applicability.This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this section.Section 7. Repeals.All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0051PN0098 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324